Utah statutes.
7-16a-103.   Application of chapter.

(1)  This chapter does not:

(a)  authorize a depository institution, or any other person, to engage in any transaction not otherwise specifically permitted by applicable law; or

(b)  apply to the use of any device capable of transmitting electronic impulses that is not readily accessible to the general public for the primary purpose of initiating transactions with depository institutions.

(2)  Use of an automated teller machine to effect a transaction is only an additional means of effecting the transaction and this chapter does not limit or enlarge the rights of persons under state or federal statute or under any rules or regulations made under those statutes that govern credit or deposit account relationships.

